Maryland, session 2025, SB0226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Person” includes the State, any county, municipal corporation or other
political subdivision of the State, or any of their units, or an individual, receiver, trustee,
guardian, executor, administrator, fiduciary, or representative of any kind, or any
partnership, firm, association, public or private corporation, or any other entity, unless
otherwise provided.
10–2001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “FMNP” means the federal Farmers Market Nutrition Program.
(c) “Fund” means the Maryland Farms and Families Fund.
(d) “Program” means the Maryland Farms and Families Program.
(e) “SNAP” means the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(f) “WIC” means the federal Special Supplemental Food Program for Women,
Infants, and Children.
10–2002.
(a) There is a Maryland Farms and Families Program in the Department.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to double the purchasing power of food–insecure
Maryland residents with limited access to fresh fruits and vegetables and to increase
revenue for farmers through redemption of federal nutrition benefits at Maryland farmers
markets.
10–2003.
(a) There is a Maryland Farms and Families Fund.
(b) The purpose of the Fund is [to provide grants] to:

SENATE BILL 226 3
(1) [Nonprofit organizations that match] MATCH purchases made with
FMNP, SNAP, and WIC benefits at participating farmers markets and farm stands;
(2) [Nonprofit] SUPPORT NONPROFIT farmers markets to implement the
Program [at the farmers markets] BY PROVIDING LOGISTICAL AND MARKETING
SUPPORT TO INCREASE THE USE OF FEDERAL NUTRITION PROGRAMS AT THESE
FARMERS MARKETS; and
(3) [Local] SUPPORT nonprofit organizations AND OTHER RESPONSIBLE
PERSONS to implement the Program in partnership with one or more participating local
farmers markets.
(c) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
(2) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(f) (1) In accordance with this subsection, THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE the
Fund [shall be used to provide grants] FOR EITHER ONE OR BOTH OF THE FOLLOWING
PURPOSES:
(i) [Nonprofit organizations that:
1. Meet the qualifications established in § 10–2004 of this
subtitle; and
2. Distribute the grant money to farmers markets and local
nonprofit organizations in accordance with this subtitle;] TO IMPLEMENT, IN WHOLE OR
IN PART, THE PROGRAM WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(ii) [Nonprofit farmers markets to implement the Program at the
farmers markets; and] TO PROVIDE FUNDS TO A QUALIFIED NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION OR OTHER RESPONSIBLE PERSON TO IMPLEMENT, IN WHOLE OR IN
PART, THE PROGRAM.

SENATE BILL 226
[(iii) Local nonprofit organizations to implement the Program in
partnership with one or more local farmers markets.]
(2) A qualified nonprofit organization OR OTHER PERSON that receives [a
grant] FUNDS under this section:
(i) Shall distribute at least 60% of the [grant] money it receives
directly to participating farmers markets as funding for local market access coordinators
and matching dollars for purchases made with FMNP, SNAP, and WIC benefits; and
(ii) May not use more than 40% of the [grant] money it receives for
Program development, promotion and outreach, farmers market training and capacity
building, technical assistance, program data collection, evaluation, administration, and
reporting.
(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Governor shall include
in the annual budget bill an appropriation to the Fund as follows:
(i) For fiscal years 2021 through 2023, $100,000; and
(ii) For fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, $300,000.
(2) The appropriation required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
be in addition to, and may not supplant, any funding appropriated to the [Marketing and
Promotion Division] AGRICULTURE AND SEAFOOD MARKETING PROGRAM in the
Department.
10–2004.
(a) (1) A nonprofit organization OR OTHER PERSON is qualified to receive [a
grant] FUNDS in accordance with this subtitle if the Department determines that the
[nonprofit] organization OR PERSON has a demonstrated record of:
(i) Designing and implementing successful healthy food incentive
programs that connect federal food benefits recipients with local producers;
(ii) Implementing funds distributing and reporting processes;
(iii) Providing training and technical assistance to farmers markets;
(iv) Conducting community outreach and data collection, including
customer surveys; and
(v) Providing a full accounting and administration of funds
distributed to farmers markets.

SENATE BILL 226 5
(2) In addition to the requirements under paragraph (1) of this subsection,
in awarding [a grant] FUNDS in accordance with this subtitle, the Department may
consider whether the [nonprofit] organization OR PERSON has a demonstrated record of
providing services in healthy food priority areas.
(b) Within 90 days after the end of a [grant cycle] CALENDAR YEAR, [a qualified
nonprofit] AN organization OR PERSON that received [a grant] FUNDS in accordance with
this subtitle shall submit a report to the Department that includes the following
information:
(1) The names and locations of Maryland farmers markets that received
funds under the Program;
(2) The dollar amount of funds awarded to each participating farmers
market;
(3) The dollar amount of FMNP, SNAP, and WIC benefits, and funds
provided under the Program that were spent at participating farmers markets, as well as
any unspent funds;
(4) The number of FMNP, SNAP, and WIC transactions carried out at
participating farmers markets; and
(5) The impact of the Program on increasing the quantity of fresh fruits
and vegetables consumed by FMNP, SNAP, and WIC families, as determined by customer
surveys.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.